Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.020

Clean energy projects of statewide significance—Application process.

(1) The department of commerce shall develop an application for the designation of clean energy projects, including facilities that produce electricity with fusion energy, as clean energy projects of statewide significance.

(2) An application to the department of commerce by an applicant under this section must include:

(a) Information regarding the location of the project;

(b) Information sufficient to demonstrate that the project qualifies as a clean energy project;

(c) An explanation of how the project is expected to contribute to the state's achievement of the greenhouse gas emission limits in chapter 70A.45 RCW and is consistent with the state energy strategy adopted by the department of commerce, as well as any contribution that the project is expected to make to other state regulatory requirements for clean energy and greenhouse gas emissions, including the requirements of chapter 19.405, 70A.30, 70A.60, 70A.65, 70A.535, or 70A.540 RCW;

(d) An explanation of how the project is expected to contribute to the state's economic development goals, including information regarding the applicant's average employment in the state for the prior year, estimated new employment related to the project, estimated wages of employees related to the project, and estimated time schedules for completion and operation;

(e) A plan for engagement and information sharing with potentially affected federally recognized Indian tribes;

(f) A description of potential community benefits and impacts from the project, a plan for community engagement in the project development, and an explanation of how the applicant might use a community benefit agreement or other legal document that stipulates the benefits that the developer agrees to fund or furnish, in exchange for community support of a project; and

(g) Other information required by the department of commerce.

(3) For the purposes of this section, "fusion energy" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 43.21F.092.

[ 2024 c 346 s 3; 2023 c 230 s 202.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.